Massachusetts, session 194th, H2595.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 6E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “untruthful or
untruthfulness” the following definition:-
“Use of force equipment”, a standardized set of equipment that shall be issued to all
officers, as defined by this section, and the Code of Massachusetts Regulations CMR 550 3.02
and shall be authorized to be carried while on duty. Use of force equipment shall include, but not
be limited to the following: (i) Semi-Automatic Handgun with a caliber of 9x19mm or higher;
(ii) Baton\PR-24, Impact tool; (iii) Non-Flammable, Electronic Device Compatible Oleoresin
Capsicum spray with a content of at least 1.33% Major Capsaicinoids and 10% Oleoresin
Capsicum or equivalent; (iv) Double locking Handcuffs.
SECTION 2. Section 63 of Chapter 22C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
the word “hospital.” in line 11 and inserting in place thereof the following “hospital, and shall be
of 2

issued for use and have access to use of force equipment, as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E.
Such special state police officers serving in non-secure areas of hospitals or psychiatric or mental
health facilities, as determined by the colonel, shall be authorized to carry use of force equipment
on their person during their service.
of 2